Washington statutes.
RCW 3.62.065

Fees allowed as court costs.

All courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW may charge fees as prescribed in RCW 3.62.060. The fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as court costs whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

[ 1992 c 62 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 62: See RCW 27.24.900.